North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 6. North Carolina Trails System. [Repealed]

§ 113A-83.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.90 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-84.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.92 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-85.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.94 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-86.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.96 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-87.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.98 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-87.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.100 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-88.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.102 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-89.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.104 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-90.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.106 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-91.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.108 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-92.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.110 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-92.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.112 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-93.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.114 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-94.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.116 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-95.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.118 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§§ 113A-96 through 113A-99.

Reserved for future codification purposes.